Utah statutes.
17-37-8.   Director to be appointed -- Duties and compensation -- Other personnel.

(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b), the county executive shall appoint a competent person as planetarium director to have immediate charge of:

(i)  planetarium facilities and activities not contracted to an outside entity; and

(ii)  overseeing the performance of the terms of any contract or lease entered into with a contracting entity.

(b)  In a county with a form of government that has a county executive that is separate from the county legislative body, the appointment under Subsection (1)(a) shall be with the advice and consent of the county legislative body.

(2)  The planetarium director shall:

(a)  have such duties and receive such compensation for the director's services as the county executive shall determine; and

(b)  act as the executive officer for the planetarium board and implement the policies of the board.

(3) (a)  The county executive may appoint, upon the recommendation of the planetarium director, other planetarium personnel.

(b)  Each county employee working at the planetarium shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 33, County Personnel Management Act, and other general laws relating to county personnel matters.

